Utah statutes.
57-6-2.   Claimant to commence action -- Complaint -- Trial of issues.

Such complaint must set forth the grounds on which the defendant seeks relief, stating as accurately as practicable the value of the real estate, exclusive of the improvements thereon made by the claimant or his grantors, and the value of such improvements. The issues joined thereon must be tried as in law actions, and the value of the real estate and of such improvements must be separately ascertained on the trial.

